output/dictionaries/Medzuslovjansky_LatinicaEtimologicna.aff
FLAG long
SFX Ce Y 12
SFX Ce 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ce 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Ce et ėt/xPxE .
SFX Ce et ty/xPxE .
SFX Ce et ta/xPxE .
SFX Ce et tov/xPxE .
SFX Ce et tu/xPxE .
SFX Ce et tah/xPxE .
SFX Ce et tam/xPxE .
SFX Ce et tom/xPxE .
SFX Ce et tami/xPxE .
SFX Ce et te/xPxE .

SFX Cf Y 6
SFX Cf 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cf y o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cf y ov/xPxE .
SFX Cf y ah/xPxE .
SFX Cf y am/xPxE .
SFX Cf y ami/xPxE .

SFX Cg Y 12
SFX Cg 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cg 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cg el ėl/xPxE .
SFX Cg el ly/xPxE .
SFX Cg el la/xPxE .
SFX Cg el lov/xPxE .
SFX Cg el lu/xPxE .
SFX Cg el lah/xPxE .
SFX Cg el lam/xPxE .
SFX Cg el lom/xPxE .
SFX Cg el lami/xPxE .
SFX Cg el le/xPxE .

SFX Ch Y 60
SFX Ch ti l .
SFX Ch ti la .
SFX Ch ti lo .
SFX Ch ti li .
SFX Ch ęti nų .
SFX Ch ęti nem .
SFX Ch ęti neš .
SFX Ch ęti ne .
SFX Ch ęti nemȯ .
SFX Ch ęti nete .
SFX Ch ęti nųt .
SFX Ch ti h .
SFX Ch ti še .
SFX Ch ti hmȯ .
SFX Ch ti ste .
SFX Ch ti hų .
SFX Ch ęti ni .
SFX Ch ęti nimȯ .
SFX Ch ęti nite .
SFX Ch ęti nųći .
SFX Ch ęti nųćego .
SFX Ch ęti nųćemu .
SFX Ch ęti nųćim .
SFX Ch ęti nųćem .
SFX Ch ęti nųćih .
SFX Ch ęti nųćimi .
SFX Ch ęti nųća .
SFX Ch ęti nųće .
SFX Ch ęti nemy .
SFX Ch ęti nemogo .
SFX Ch ęti nemomu .
SFX Ch ęti nemym .
SFX Ch ęti nemom .
SFX Ch ęti nemo .
SFX Ch ęti nema .
SFX Ch ęti nemų .
SFX Ch ęti nemoj .
SFX Ch ęti nemojų .
SFX Ch ęti nemi .
SFX Ch ęti neme .
SFX Ch ęti nemyh .
SFX Ch ęti nemym .
SFX Ch ęti nemymi .
SFX Ch ęti nemo .
SFX Ch ti vši .
SFX Ch ti všego .
SFX Ch ti všemu .
SFX Ch ti všim .
SFX Ch ti všem .
SFX Ch ti vših .
SFX Ch ti všimi .
SFX Ch ti vša .
SFX Ch ti všų .
SFX Ch ti všej .
SFX Ch ti všejų .
SFX Ch ti vše .
SFX Ch i y .
SFX Ch i a .
SFX Ch i o .
SFX Ch ti ťje .

SFX Ci Y 12
SFX Ci 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ci 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Ci el ėl/xPxE .
SFX Ci el li/xPxE .
SFX Ci el la/xPxE .
SFX Ci el lov/xPxE .
SFX Ci el lu/xPxE .
SFX Ci el lah/xPxE .
SFX Ci el lam/xPxE .
SFX Ci el lom/xPxE .
SFX Ci el lami/xPxE .
SFX Ci el le/xPxE .

SFX Cj Y 10
SFX Cj 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cj a o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cj a y/xPxE .
SFX Cj a ų/xPxE .
SFX Cj a ě/xPxE .
SFX Cj 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Cj 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Cj a ojų/xPxE .
SFX Cj 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Cj a o/xPxE .

SFX Ck Y 28
SFX Ck 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Ck y o/xBxPxE .
SFX Ck y a/xPxE .
SFX Ck y ogo/xPxE .
SFX Ck y ų/xPxE .
SFX Ck y oj/xPxE .
SFX Ck y om/xPxE .
SFX Ck y omu/xPxE .
SFX Ck 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Ck y ojų/xPxE .
SFX Ck y i/xPxE .
SFX Ck y e/xPxE .
SFX Ck 0 h/xPxE .
SFX Ck 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX Ck hy šějši/zz .
SFX Ck hy šějšego/zz .
SFX Ck hy šějšemu/zz .
SFX Ck hy šějšim/zz .
SFX Ck hy šějšem/zz .
SFX Ck hy šějše/zz .
SFX Ck hy šějša/zz .
SFX Ck hy šějšų/zz .
SFX Ck hy šějšej/zz .
SFX Ck hy šějšejų/zz .
SFX Ck hy šějših/zz .
SFX Ck hy šějšim/zz .
SFX Ck hy šějšimi/zz .
SFX Ck hy šeje/zz .

SFX Cl Y 78
SFX Cl ti l .
SFX Cl ti la .
SFX Cl ti lo .
SFX Cl ti li .
SFX Cl kati čų .
SFX Cl kati čem .
SFX Cl kati češ .
SFX Cl kati če .
SFX Cl kati čemȯ .
SFX Cl kati čete .
SFX Cl kati čųt .
SFX Cl ti h .
SFX Cl ti še .
SFX Cl ti hmȯ .
SFX Cl ti ste .
SFX Cl ti hų .
SFX Cl kati či .
SFX Cl kati čimȯ .
SFX Cl kati čite .
SFX Cl kati čųći .
SFX Cl kati čųćego .
SFX Cl kati čųćemu .
SFX Cl kati čųćim .
SFX Cl kati čųćem .
SFX Cl kati čųćih .
SFX Cl kati čųćimi .
SFX Cl kati čųća .
SFX Cl kati čųće .
SFX Cl kati čemy .
SFX Cl kati čemogo .
SFX Cl kati čemomu .
SFX Cl kati čemym .
SFX Cl kati čemom .
SFX Cl kati čemo .
SFX Cl kati čema .
SFX Cl kati čemų .
SFX Cl kati čemoj .
SFX Cl kati čemojų .
SFX Cl kati čemi .
SFX Cl kati čeme .
SFX Cl kati čemyh .
SFX Cl kati čemym .
SFX Cl kati čemymi .
SFX Cl kati čemo .
SFX Cl ti vši .
SFX Cl ti všego .
SFX Cl ti všemu .
SFX Cl ti všim .
SFX Cl ti všem .
SFX Cl ti vših .
SFX Cl ti všimi .
SFX Cl ti vša .
SFX Cl ti všų .
SFX Cl ti všej .
SFX Cl ti všejų .
SFX Cl ti vše .
SFX Cl ti ny .
SFX Cl ti nogo .
SFX Cl ti nomu .
SFX Cl ti nym .
SFX Cl ti nom .
SFX Cl ti ni .
SFX Cl ti ne .
SFX Cl ti nyh .
SFX Cl ti nymi .
SFX Cl ti na .
SFX Cl ti nų .
SFX Cl ti noj .
SFX Cl ti nojų .
SFX Cl ti no .
SFX Cl ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX Cl ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX Cl ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX Cl ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX Cl ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Cl ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX Cl ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX Cl ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX Cm Y 69
SFX Cm ti l .
SFX Cm ti la .
SFX Cm ti lo .
SFX Cm ti li .
SFX Cm sěti šų .
SFX Cm ěti im .
SFX Cm ěti iš .
SFX Cm ěti i .
SFX Cm ěti imȯ .
SFX Cm ěti ite .
SFX Cm ěti ęt .
SFX Cm ti h .
SFX Cm ti še .
SFX Cm ti hmȯ .
SFX Cm ti ste .
SFX Cm ti hų .
SFX Cm ěti ęći .
SFX Cm ěti ęća .
SFX Cm ěti ęće .
SFX Cm ěti imy .
SFX Cm ěti imogo .
SFX Cm ěti imomu .
SFX Cm ěti imym .
SFX Cm ěti imom .
SFX Cm ěti imo .
SFX Cm ěti ima .
SFX Cm ěti imų .
SFX Cm ěti imoj .
SFX Cm ěti imojų .
SFX Cm ěti imi .
SFX Cm ěti ime .
SFX Cm ěti imyh .
SFX Cm ěti imym .
SFX Cm ěti imymi .
SFX Cm ěti imo .
SFX Cm ti vši .
SFX Cm ti všego .
SFX Cm ti všemu .
SFX Cm ti všim .
SFX Cm ti všem .
SFX Cm ti vših .
SFX Cm ti všimi .
SFX Cm ti vša .
SFX Cm ti všų .
SFX Cm ti všej .
SFX Cm ti všejų .
SFX Cm ti vše .
SFX Cm ti ny .
SFX Cm ti nogo .
SFX Cm ti nomu .
SFX Cm ti nym .
SFX Cm ti nom .
SFX Cm ti ni .
SFX Cm ti ne .
SFX Cm ti nyh .
SFX Cm ti nymi .
SFX Cm ti na .
SFX Cm ti nų .
SFX Cm ti noj .
SFX Cm ti nojų .
SFX Cm ti no .
SFX Cm ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX Cm ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX Cm ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX Cm ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX Cm ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Cm ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX Cm ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX Cm ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX Cn Y 17
SFX Cn 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cn o o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cn o a/xPxE .
SFX Cn o esa/xPxE .
SFX Cn o ese/xPxE .
SFX Cn o 0 .
SFX Cn o es/xPxE .
SFX Cn o u/xPxE .
SFX Cn o esi/xPxE .
SFX Cn o ah/xPxE .
SFX Cn o esah/xPxE .
SFX Cn o am/xPxE .
SFX Cn o esam/xPxE .
SFX Cn 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Cn o esem/xPxE .
SFX Cn o ami/xPxE .
SFX Cn o esami/xPxE .

SFX Co Y 9
SFX Co 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Co o o/xPxBxO .
SFX Co o a/xPxE .
SFX Co ko ȯk/xPxE .
SFX Co o u/xPxE .
SFX Co o ah/xPxE .
SFX Co o am/xPxE .
SFX Co 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Co o ami/xPxE .

SFX Cp Y 3
SFX Cp ťsȯt tistah .
SFX Cp ťsȯt tistam .
SFX Cp sȯt jųstami .

SFX Cq Y 10
SFX Cq 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cq 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cq ď di/xPxE .
SFX Cq 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Cq 0 ev/xPxE .
SFX Cq 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Cq 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Cq 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Cq 0 em/xPxE .
SFX Cq 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX Cr Y 69
SFX Cr sti tl .
SFX Cr sti tla .
SFX Cr sti tlo .
SFX Cr sti tli .
SFX Cr sti tų .
SFX Cr sti tem .
SFX Cr sti teš .
SFX Cr sti te .
SFX Cr sti temȯ .
SFX Cr sti tete .
SFX Cr sti tųt .
SFX Cr sti teh .
SFX Cr sti teše .
SFX Cr sti tehmȯ .
SFX Cr sti teste .
SFX Cr sti tehų .
SFX Cr sti ti .
SFX Cr sti timȯ .
SFX Cr sti tite .
SFX Cr sti tųći .
SFX Cr sti tųćego .
SFX Cr sti tųćemu .
SFX Cr sti tųćim .
SFX Cr sti tųćem .
SFX Cr sti tųćih .
SFX Cr sti tųćimi .
SFX Cr sti tųća .
SFX Cr sti tųće .
SFX Cr sti tomy .
SFX Cr sti tomogo .
SFX Cr sti tomomu .
SFX Cr sti tomym .
SFX Cr sti tomom .
SFX Cr sti tomo .
SFX Cr sti toma .
SFX Cr sti tomų .
SFX Cr sti tomoj .
SFX Cr sti tomojų .
SFX Cr sti tomi .
SFX Cr sti tome .
SFX Cr sti tomyh .
SFX Cr sti tomym .
SFX Cr sti tomymi .
SFX Cr sti tomo .
SFX Cr sti tši .
SFX Cr sti tša .
SFX Cr sti tše .
SFX Cr sti teny .
SFX Cr sti tenogo .
SFX Cr sti tenomu .
SFX Cr sti tenym .
SFX Cr sti tenom .
SFX Cr sti teni .
SFX Cr sti tene .
SFX Cr sti tenyh .
SFX Cr sti tenymi .
SFX Cr sti tena .
SFX Cr sti tenų .
SFX Cr sti tenoj .
SFX Cr sti tenojų .
SFX Cr sti teno .
SFX Cr sti teńje/xPxE .
SFX Cr sti teńja/xPxE .
SFX Cr sti teńju/xPxE .
SFX Cr sti teńjem/xPxE .
SFX Cr sti tenij/xPxE .
SFX Cr sti teńjam/xPxE .
SFX Cr sti teńjami/xPxE .
SFX Cr sti teńjah/xPxE .

SFX Cs Y 9
SFX Cs j 0 .
SFX Cs j go .
SFX Cs j m .
SFX Cs j mu .
SFX Cs ej im .
SFX Cs 0 ų .
SFX Cs ej i .
SFX Cs ej ih .
SFX Cs ej imi .

SFX Ct Y 3
SFX Ct sȯt istah .
SFX Ct sȯt istam .
SFX Ct sȯt jųstami .

SFX Cu Y 4
SFX Cu 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cu 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX Cu 0 i/xPxE .
SFX Cu 0 jų/xPxE .

SFX Cv Y 5
SFX Cv 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cv i o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cv i yh/xPxE .
SFX Cv i ym/xPxE .
SFX Cv i ymi/xPxE .

SFX Cw Y 9
SFX Cw 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cw o o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cw o a/xPxE .
SFX Cw lo ȯl/xPxE .
SFX Cw o u/xPxE .
SFX Cw o ah/xPxE .
SFX Cw o am/xPxE .
SFX Cw 0 m/xPxE .
SFX Cw o ami/xPxE .

SFX Cx Y 78
SFX Cx ti l .
SFX Cx ti la .
SFX Cx ti lo .
SFX Cx ti li .
SFX Cx evati ujų .
SFX Cx evati ujem .
SFX Cx evati uješ .
SFX Cx evati uje .
SFX Cx evati ujemȯ .
SFX Cx evati ujete .
SFX Cx evati ujųt .
SFX Cx ti h .
SFX Cx ti še .
SFX Cx ti hmȯ .
SFX Cx ti ste .
SFX Cx ti hų .
SFX Cx evati uj .
SFX Cx evati ujmȯ .
SFX Cx evati ujte .
SFX Cx evati ujųći .
SFX Cx evati ujųćego .
SFX Cx evati ujųćemu .
SFX Cx evati ujųćim .
SFX Cx evati ujųćem .
SFX Cx evati ujųćih .
SFX Cx evati ujųćimi .
SFX Cx evati ujųća .
SFX Cx evati ujųće .
SFX Cx evati ujemy .
SFX Cx evati ujemogo .
SFX Cx evati ujemomu .
SFX Cx evati ujemym .
SFX Cx evati ujemom .
SFX Cx evati ujemo .
SFX Cx evati ujema .
SFX Cx evati ujemų .
SFX Cx evati ujemoj .
SFX Cx evati ujemojų .
SFX Cx evati ujemi .
SFX Cx evati ujeme .
SFX Cx evati ujemyh .
SFX Cx evati ujemym .
SFX Cx evati ujemymi .
SFX Cx evati ujemo .
SFX Cx ti vši .
SFX Cx ti všego .
SFX Cx ti všemu .
SFX Cx ti všim .
SFX Cx ti všem .
SFX Cx ti vših .
SFX Cx ti všimi .
SFX Cx ti vša .
SFX Cx ti všų .
SFX Cx ti všej .
SFX Cx ti všejų .
SFX Cx ti vše .
SFX Cx ti ny .
SFX Cx ti nogo .
SFX Cx ti nomu .
SFX Cx ti nym .
SFX Cx ti nom .
SFX Cx ti ni .
SFX Cx ti ne .
SFX Cx ti nyh .
SFX Cx ti nymi .
SFX Cx ti na .
SFX Cx ti nų .
SFX Cx ti noj .
SFX Cx ti nojų .
SFX Cx ti no .
SFX Cx ti ńje/xPxE .
SFX Cx ti ńja/xPxE .
SFX Cx ti ńju/xPxE .
SFX Cx ti ńjem/xPxE .
SFX Cx ti nij/xPxE .
SFX Cx ti ńjam/xPxE .
SFX Cx ti ńjami/xPxE .
SFX Cx ti ńjah/xPxE .

SFX Cy Y 11
SFX Cy 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cy 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cy 0 i/xPxE .
SFX Cy 0 a/xPxE .
SFX Cy 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX Cy 0 u/xPxE .
SFX Cy 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Cy 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Cy 0 om/xPxE .
SFX Cy 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX Cy g že/xPxE .

SFX Cz Y 8
SFX Cz 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Cz 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX Cz ś si/xPxE .
SFX Cz ś sij/xPxE .
SFX Cz 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX Cz 0 am/xPxE .
SFX Cz 0 jų/xPxE .
SFX Cz 0 ami/xPxE .

SFX DA Y 9
SFX DA 0 0/xPxE .
SFX DA 0 e/xPxBxO .
SFX DA ȯlj lj/xPxE .
SFX DA ȯlj lja/xPxE .
SFX DA 0 a/xPxE .
SFX DA ȯlj lju/xPxE .
SFX DA 0 u/xPxE .
SFX DA ȯlj ljem/xPxE .
SFX DA 0 em/xPxE .

SFX DB Y 13
SFX DB y o .
SFX DB y a .
SFX DB y ogo .
SFX DB y ų .
SFX DB y oj .
SFX DB y om .
SFX DB y omu .
SFX DB 0 m .
SFX DB y ojų .
SFX DB y i .
SFX DB y e .
SFX DB 0 h .
SFX DB 0 mi .

SFX DC Y 21
SFX DC 0 0/xPxE .
SFX DC 0 o/xPxBxO .
SFX DC ȯz z/xPxE .
SFX DC ȯz zy/xPxE .
SFX DC 0 y/xPxE .
SFX DC ȯz za/xPxE .
SFX DC 0 a/xPxE .
SFX DC ȯz zov/xPxE .
SFX DC 0 ov/xPxE .
SFX DC ȯz zu/xPxE .
SFX DC 0 u/xPxE .
SFX DC ȯz zah/xPxE .
SFX DC 0 ah/xPxE .
SFX DC ȯz zam/xPxE .
SFX DC 0 am/xPxE .
SFX DC ȯz zom/xPxE .
SFX DC 0 om/xPxE .
SFX DC ȯz zami/xPxE .
SFX DC 0 ami/xPxE .
SFX DC ȯz ze/xPxE .
SFX DC 0 e/xPxE .

SFX DD Y 28
SFX DD 0 0/xPxE .
SFX DD y o/xBxPxE .
SFX DD y a/xPxE .
SFX DD y ogo/xPxE .
SFX DD y ų/xPxE .
SFX DD y oj/xPxE .
SFX DD y om/xPxE .
SFX DD y omu/xPxE .
SFX DD 0 m/xPxE .
SFX DD y ojų/xPxE .
SFX DD y i/xPxE .
SFX DD y e/xPxE .
SFX DD 0 h/xPxE .
SFX DD 0 mi/xPxE .
SFX DD lky ľši/zz .
SFX DD lky ľšego/zz .
SFX DD lky ľšemu/zz .
SFX DD lky ľšim/zz .
SFX DD lky ľšem/zz .
SFX DD lky ľše/zz .
SFX DD lky ľša/zz .
SFX DD lky ľšų/zz .
SFX DD lky ľšej/zz .
SFX DD lky ľšejų/zz .
SFX DD lky ľših/zz .
SFX DD lky ľšim/zz .
SFX DD lky ľšimi/zz .
SFX DD ky je/zz .

SFX DE Y 3
SFX DE i ěh .
SFX DE i ěm .
SFX DE i ěmi .
